de: Dateiform: Konturiert; Oval; Rechteckig; Sonstiges
nl: Vorm bestand: Voorgevormd; Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Andere
sv: Form på fil: Konturerad; Oval; Rektangulär; Annat
en: File shape: Contoured; Oval; Rectangular; Other
nb: Filform: Konturformet; Oval; Rektangulær; Annen
sl-SI: Oblika pilice: Oblikovana; Ovalna; Pravokotna; Drugo
sk-SK: Tvar pilníka: Tvarovaný; Oválny; Obdĺžnikový; Iné
ru: Форма пилки: Контурный; Овал; Прямоугольник; Другой
hu: Reszelő alakja: Körvonalas; Ovális; Szögletes; Egyéb
zh-TW: 銼刀形狀: 輪廓; 橢圓形; 長方形; 其他
fi: Kansion muoto: Muotoiltu; Soikea; Suorakulmainen; Muu
fr: Forme du fichier: Profilé; Oval; Rectangulaire; Autre
ja: ファイルの形状: 輪郭; 楕円形; 長方形; その他
bg-BG: Форма на пила: Контурен; Овална; Правоъгълна; Други
tr: Dosya şekli: Konturlu; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Diğer
pt-PT: Formato do ficheiro: Contornado; Oval; Retangular; Outro
th: รูปร่างแฟ้ม: โค้งมน; รูปไข่; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; อื่นๆ
pl: Kształt pilnika: Wyprofilowane; Owalny; Prostokątna; Pozostałe
es: Forma de la lima: Contorneado; Ovalado; Rectangular; Otros
pt-BR: Formato do arquivo: Contornado; Oval; Retangular; Outro
ko: 파일 형태: 윤곽; 타원형; 직사각형; 기타
it: Forma della cartella: Sagomata; Ovale; Rettangolare; Altro
ro-RO: Formă pilă: Conturat; Oval; Dreptunghiular; Altele
zh-CN: 文件形状: 轮廓; 椭圆形; 矩形; 其他
lt-LT: Šveitiklio forma: Kontūrinė; Ovali; Stačiakampė; Kita
cs: Tvar pilníku: Konturovaný; Oválný; Obdélníkový; Jiné
vi: Hình dạng máy chà nhám giũa: Hình dạng được định hình; Hình trái xoan; Chữ nhật; Khác
hr-HR: Oblik rašpe: Konturirano; Oval; Pravokutnik; Ostalo
el: Σχήμα λιμαρίσματος: Με περίγραμμα; Οβάλ; Ορθογώνιο; Άλλο
da: Filform: Kontureret; Oval; Rektangulær; Andet